California statutes. Elections Code
2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 4000, 4001, 4002

1286.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020,
 3021, 3022, 3023

1321.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 2016

1432.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011

1433.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2013, 2014

1434.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 2000, 2001, 2002

1436.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1011

1436.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1006, 1007

9304.00--the following census blocks:

2177, 2178, 2179, 2180, 2181, 2197, 2198, 2199, 2200, 2201

9800.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21430.

Congressional District 30 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 30

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

1011.10, 1011.22, 1012.20, 1012.21, 1012.22, 1013.00, 1014.00, 1031.01, 1031.02, 1034.01, 1034.02, 1871.01, 1873.00, 1881.00, 1882.01, 1882.02, 1883.00, 1891.01, 1891.02, 1892.01, 1892.02, 1893.00, 1894.00, 1895.01, 1895.02, 1896.00, 1897.02, 1897.03, 1897.04, 1898.01, 1898.02, 1899.03, 1899.04, 1899.05, 1899.06, 1899.07, 1901.01, 1901.02, 1902.01, 1902.02, 1903.02, 1903.03, 1904.01, 1904.02, 1905.10, 1905.20, 1907.01, 1907.02, 1908.01, 1908.02, 1909.01, 1909.02, 1910.00, 1911.10, 1911.20, 1912.01, 1912.03, 1912.04,
 1913.01, 1913.02, 1914.10, 1914.20, 1915.00, 1916.10, 1916.20, 1917.10, 1917.20, 1918.10, 1918.20, 1919.01, 1919.02, 1920.01, 1920.02, 1923.00, 1924.10, 1924.20, 1944.01, 1944.02, 1945.00, 1951.00, 1952.01, 1952.02, 1953.00, 1954.00, 1955.00, 1956.00, 1957.20, 1958.03, 1958.04, 1959.01, 1959.02, 1973.00, 1974.10, 1974.20, 1975.00, 2110.00, 2140.00, 2141.00, 2144.00, 2145.01, 2145.03, 2145.04, 2145.05, 2146.00, 2147.00, 2148.00, 2149.02, 2149.03, 2149.04, 2151.01, 2151.02, 2162.01, 2163.01, 2163.02, 3003.01, 3004.00, 3006.01, 3006.02, 3007.01, 3007.02, 3008.00, 3009.01, 3009.02, 3010.00, 3011.00, 3012.03, 3012.04, 3012.05, 3012.06, 3013.00, 3014.00, 3015.01, 3015.02, 3016.01, 3016.02, 3017.01, 3017.02, 3018.01, 3018.02, 3019.01, 3019.02, 3020.02, 3020.03, 3020.04, 3021.02, 3021.03, 3021.04, 3022.01, 3022.02, 3023.01, 3023.02, 3024.01, 3025.03, 3025.04, 3025.05, 3025.06, 3101.00, 3102.01, 3102.02, 3103.00, 3104.00, 3105.01, 3106.01, 3106.02, 3107.01, 3107.03, 3107.04, 3107.05, 3108.00, 3109.00, 3110.00,
 3111.00, 3112.00, 3113.00, 3114.00, 3115.00, 3116.01, 3116.02, 3117.00, 3118.01, 3118.02, 7001.01, 7001.02, 7002.00, 7003.00, 7004.00, 7005.01, 7005.02, 9108.10, 9800.01, 9800.09, 9800.20, 9800.26, 9800.39

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

1021.07--the following census blocks:

1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2010, 2023

1032.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2009

1032.02--the following census blocks:

1000

1041.24--the following census blocks:

2001, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009,
 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3024, 3025

1437.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

1864.01--the following census blocks:

2008, 2009

1871.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029

1872.00--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007,
 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015

1926.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2003

1927.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2010, 2011

1941.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

1941.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3002

1942.00--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014

1957.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3006, 3007

1958.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1011, 1012

1959.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002

1972.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2002, 3001, 3002, 3003

1990.02--the following
 census blocks:

2008, 2009, 2010, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2042

2060.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001

2115.00--the following census blocks:

1004, 1005, 1006, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

2117.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008

2127.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011,
 1012, 1013, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

2161.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 3000, 3001, 3002

2162.02--the following census blocks:

1002, 1005, 1006, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

3005.03--the following census blocks:

1011

4608.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1017, 1018, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020,
 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2027, 2029

4609.00--the following census blocks:

4000, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4009, 4010, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 5007

4616.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4004, 4005, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015

4617.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021,
 2026, 2027

9102.13--the following census blocks:

1038, 1051, 1067, 1068

9107.09--the following census blocks:

1037

9108.04--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101, 1102, 1103, 1104, 1105, 1106, 1107,
 1108, 1109, 1110, 1111, 1112, 1113, 1114, 1115, 1116, 1117, 1118, 1119, 1120, 1121, 1122, 1123, 1124, 1125, 1126, 1127, 1128, 1129, 1130, 1131, 1133

9108.08--the following census blocks:

1000, 1004, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012

9108.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1004, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019

9108.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060,
 1061, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2077, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2084

9108.15--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1074, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 2003, 2004, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017,
 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3045, 3049, 3050, 3064, 3065, 3066, 3067, 3068, 3070, 3071, 3072, 3073, 3074, 3075, 3076, 3077, 3078, 3079, 3080, 3081, 3082, 3083, 3084, 3085, 3086, 3087, 3088, 3089, 3090, 3091, 3092, 3093, 3094, 3095, 3096, 3097, 3098, 3100, 3101, 3102, 3103, 3104, 3105, 3106, 3111, 3112, 3116, 3117, 3118,
 3119, 3120, 3121, 3122, 3123, 3124, 3125, 3126, 3127, 3128, 3129, 3130, 3131, 3132, 3133, 3134, 3135, 3136, 3137, 3138, 3139, 3140, 3141, 3142, 3143, 3144, 3145, 3146, 3147, 3148, 3149, 3150, 3151, 3152, 3153, 3154, 3155, 3156, 3157, 3158, 3159, 3160, 3161, 3162, 3163, 3164, 3165, 3166, 3167, 3168, 3169, 3170, 3171, 3172, 3173, 3174, 3175, 3176, 3177, 3181, 3182, 3183, 3184, 3185, 3200, 3201, 3202, 3203, 3204, 3205, 3206, 3207, 3208, 3209, 3210, 3211, 3212

9200.43--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046

9304.00--the following census blocks:

1027, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039,
 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 2041, 2042, 2043, 2044, 2045, 2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2050, 2051, 2052, 2053, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 2072, 2073, 2074, 2075, 2076, 2077, 2078, 2079, 2080, 2081, 2082, 2083, 2084, 2085, 2086, 2087, 2088, 2089, 2090, 2091, 2092, 2093, 2094, 2095, 2096, 2097, 2098, 2099, 2100, 2101, 2102, 2103, 2104, 2105, 2106, 2107, 2108, 2109, 2110, 2111, 2112, 2113, 2114, 2115, 2116, 2117, 2118, 2119, 2120, 2121, 2122, 2123, 2124, 2125, 2126, 2127, 2128, 2129, 2130, 2131, 2132, 2133, 2134, 2135, 2136, 2137, 2138, 2139, 2140, 2141, 2142, 2143, 2144, 2145, 2146, 2147, 2148, 2149, 2150, 2151, 2152, 2153, 2154, 2155, 2156, 2157, 2158, 2159, 2160, 2161, 2162, 2163, 2164, 2165, 2166, 2167, 2168,
 2169, 2170, 2171, 2172, 2173, 2174, 2175, 2176, 2182, 2183, 2184, 2185, 2186, 2192, 2193, 2194, 2195, 2196

9800.10--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1011, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1023, 1024, 1025

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21431.

Congressional District 31 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 31

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

4002.07, 4002.08, 4003.04, 4004.02, 4004.03, 4006.02, 4006.03, 4006.05, 4008.01, 4010.01, 4010.02, 4011.01, 4011.02, 4012.01, 4012.02, 4012.03, 4013.03, 4013.04, 4013.11, 4013.12, 4015.00, 4016.02, 4024.03, 4024.04, 4024.05, 4025.03, 4025.04, 4028.03, 4028.04, 4029.02, 4029.03, 4029.04, 4030.00, 4033.17, 4033.18, 4034.01, 4034.02, 4034.03, 4034.04, 4034.07, 4034.08, 4034.09, 4035.00, 4036.01, 4037.02, 4037.03, 4037.21, 4037.22, 4038.01, 4038.02, 4039.01, 4039.02, 4040.00, 4041.00, 4042.01, 4042.03, 4043.01, 4043.02,
 4044.01, 4044.02, 4045.01, 4045.03, 4045.04, 4046.00, 4053.01, 4053.02, 4054.00, 4055.00, 4056.00, 4057.01, 4057.02, 4058.00, 4059.00, 4060.00, 4061.01, 4061.03, 4062.01, 4063.00, 4064.13, 4065.00, 4066.01, 4066.02, 4067.01, 4067.02, 4068.01, 4071.01, 4071.02, 4072.01, 4072.02, 4073.01, 4073.02, 4074.00, 4075.01, 4075.02, 4076.01, 4077.02, 4078.01, 4079.01, 4079.02, 4080.03, 4080.04, 4080.05, 4080.06, 4081.34, 4081.35, 4081.36, 4089.00, 4300.03, 4300.04, 4300.05, 4301.01, 4301.02, 4302.00, 4303.01, 4303.02, 4309.01, 4309.02, 4310.02, 4310.03, 4310.04, 4311.00, 4312.00

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

4002.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2007, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2026, 2027, 2033, 2034, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011,
 3012

4004.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2017, 2018, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2031, 2032, 2034, 2035, 2036, 2037, 2038, 2039, 2040, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

4005.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036

4016.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007,
 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

4025.01--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

4028.01--the following census blocks:

1012, 1013, 1014, 1017, 1020, 1021, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020

4033.16--the
 following census blocks:

1014

4033.27--the following census blocks:

1007, 1008, 1079

4047.03--the following census blocks:

2009, 2011

4069.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 5000, 5001, 5002, 5003, 5004, 5005, 5006, 6000, 6001, 6002, 6003, 6004, 6005, 6006, 6007, 6008

4070.01--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2001, 2002, 2004, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005,
 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

4070.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2022, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030

4076.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 4000, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007

4077.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005

4078.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3000,
 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

4081.33--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002

4081.37--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 3005, 3006, 3007

4081.41--the following census blocks:

1000, 2000, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

4088.00--the following census blocks:

2046, 2047, 2048, 2049, 2052, 2053, 2054, 2055, 2056, 2057, 2058, 2059, 2060, 2061, 2062, 2063, 2064, 2065, 2066, 2067, 2068, 2069, 2070, 2071, 3018

4090.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027, 4028, 4029, 4030, 4031, 4032, 4033, 4034, 4035, 4036, 4037, 4038, 4039, 4040, 4041, 4042, 4043, 4044, 4045, 4046

4313.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004

4314.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015

SAN BERNARDINO

Whole Tracts in San Bernardino County

0002.03, 0002.05, 0002.07, 0002.08, 0003.04, 0003.05, 0003.06, 0003.07, 0003.08, 0004.03, 0004.04, 0005.01, 0005.03, 0006.03, 0006.04, 0006.05, 0006.06, 0019.01

Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County

0002.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 2020, 2024, 2028, 2029, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3006, 3007

0004.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4015, 4017, 4018, 4019

0005.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018,
 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3032, 3033

0017.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005

0019.11--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017

0122.01--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000,
 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035

0122.02--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21432.

Congressional District 32 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 32

LOS ANGELES

Whole Tracts in Los Angeles County

1081.01, 1081.02, 1081.03, 1081.04, 1082.02, 1082.03, 1082.04, 1112.04, 1112.05, 1112.06, 1113.04, 1131.01, 1131.02, 1132.11, 1132.12, 1132.13, 1132.31, 1132.32, 1132.34, 1132.35, 1132.37, 1132.38, 1132.39, 1133.01, 1133.03, 1133.22, 1133.23, 1133.24, 1134.23, 1134.24, 1134.25, 1134.26, 1134.27, 1134.28, 1151.03, 1152.03, 1152.04, 1287.03, 1287.04, 1288.01, 1288.02, 1289.10, 1310.24, 1316.00, 1317.01, 1317.02, 1325.01, 1325.02, 1330.00, 1331.01, 1331.02, 1340.01, 1340.02, 1341.01, 1341.03, 1341.04, 1342.01, 1343.04,
 1343.05, 1343.06, 1345.20, 1345.21, 1345.22, 1347.10, 1347.20, 1348.01, 1348.02, 1349.01, 1349.04, 1349.05, 1349.06, 1349.07, 1351.11, 1351.16, 1371.03, 1371.04, 1375.01, 1375.02, 1375.04, 1380.00, 1390.01, 1392.00, 1393.01, 1393.02, 1393.03, 1394.01, 1394.02, 1395.02, 1395.04, 1395.05, 1395.06, 1396.00, 1397.01, 1397.03, 1397.04, 1397.05, 1398.01, 1398.02, 1411.01, 1411.02, 1412.01, 1412.02, 1413.03, 1413.04, 1413.05, 1413.06, 1414.00, 1415.00, 1416.00, 1417.00, 1433.02, 1434.01, 1435.00, 1436.02, 1436.06, 1438.01, 1438.02, 1439.01, 1439.02, 1943.00, 2611.02, 2611.03, 2611.04, 2612.00, 2621.00, 2622.00, 2623.01, 2623.02, 2623.03, 2624.00, 2625.01, 2626.01, 2626.04, 2627.04, 2627.06, 2628.02, 2640.00, 2641.02, 2641.03, 2643.03, 2643.04, 2643.06, 2654.10, 2654.20, 2655.21, 2655.22, 2674.03, 2674.04, 2674.05, 2674.06, 8004.06, 8004.10, 8004.11, 8004.12, 8005.04, 8005.06, 9800.17, 9800.19, 9800.23, 9800.24, 9901.00

Partial Tracts in Los Angeles County

1066.43--the following census blocks:

1003, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1010, 1012, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018

1112.01--the following census blocks:

2002, 2003, 2008, 2009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012

1112.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022

1113.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000

1113.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023

1151.01--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012

1151.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 3000, 3001, 4000

1152.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010

1153.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008

1246.00--the following census blocks:

1012, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

1247.00--the following census blocks:

3007, 3008

1254.02--the following census blocks:

1014

1285.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2008, 2009, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006

1286.02--the following census blocks:

3014, 3015

1310.21--the following census blocks:

2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

1310.22--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004

1310.23--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023

1318.01--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1016, 1017

1323.01--the following census blocks:

2001, 2002, 2003

1327.00--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1008, 2009

1329.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

1343.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010

1343.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014

1351.13--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1008, 1009

1372.02--the following census blocks:

2000, 2004

1432.00--the following census blocks:

1009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013

1433.01--the following census blocks:

1010, 2011, 2012

1434.02--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 2003, 2004, 2005

1436.03--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012,
 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

1436.05--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005

1437.00--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

1941.01--the following census blocks:

2002

1941.02--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 3000, 3001, 3003

1942.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011

2643.05--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004

2655.23--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005

2655.24--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2014

2673.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2002, 2003

2675.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1005

2675.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001

8001.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1024, 2009, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2022

8001.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010

8001.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013,
 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1058, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1068, 1069, 1070, 1071, 1072, 1073, 1075, 1076, 1077, 1078, 1079, 1080, 1081, 1082, 1083, 1084, 1085, 1086, 1087, 1088, 1089, 1090, 1091, 1092, 1093, 1094, 1095, 1096, 1097, 1098, 1099, 1100, 1101

8002.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023

8003.35--the following census blocks:

3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028,
 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019, 4020, 4021, 4022, 4023, 4024, 4025, 4026, 4027

8003.36--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

9203.03--the following census blocks:

1005, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042

9902.00--the following census blocks:

0001, 0002, 0003, 0004

VENTURA

Whole Tracts in Ventura County

0075.05, 0075.12, 0075.13,
 0078.00, 0079.01, 0079.03, 0079.04, 0080.01, 0080.02, 0080.04, 0080.05, 0081.01, 0082.01, 0082.02, 0083.02, 0083.03, 0083.04, 0083.07, 0083.08, 0084.01, 0085.01

Partial Tracts in Ventura County

0073.00--the following census blocks:

1095

0074.05--the following census blocks:

2005, 2006

0075.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013

0075.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008, 4009, 4010, 4011, 4012, 4013, 4014, 4015, 4016, 4017, 4018, 4019

0075.09--the following census blocks:

1000

0075.11--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1009, 1013, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017

0075.15--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008,
 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012

0075.16--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014

0076.14--the following census blocks:

2011, 2012, 2015

0077.00--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1015, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057, 1059, 1060, 1061, 1062, 1063, 1064, 1065, 1066, 1067, 1069, 1070, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027,
 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033, 2034, 2035, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014

0084.02--the following census blocks:

1002, 1006, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005, 4006, 4007, 4008

0085.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2015, 2016, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2032, 2033

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   (AB 604)   Effective August 21, 2025.   Conditionally repealed pursuant to Section 21455.)
-------------------------------------------

21433.

Congressional District 33 consists of the following:

Partial Counties in Congressional District 33

RIVERSIDE

Partial Tracts in Riverside County

0422.06--the following census blocks:

1000, 1009

0422.09--the following census blocks:

1000, 1002, 1003, 1009

0422.12--the following census blocks:

3000, 3001, 3002, 3006

0422.13--the following census blocks:

2010

0422.14--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1013, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1039, 1040, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 3000, 3001

0423.00--the following census blocks:

1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1014, 1015, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2029, 2030, 2031, 2034, 2035, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022, 3023, 3024, 3025, 3026, 3027, 3028, 3029, 3030, 3031, 3032, 3033, 3034, 3035, 3036, 3037, 3038, 3039, 3040, 3041, 3042, 3043, 3044, 3046, 3047, 3048

0424.12--the following census
 blocks:

1000, 1001, 2001, 2002, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009

0509.01--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001

0509.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1007, 1008, 1009, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015

SAN BERNARDINO

Whole Tracts in San Bernardino County

0013.11, 0020.29, 0020.31, 0020.37, 0020.38, 0020.39, 0020.43, 0020.44, 0020.45, 0020.46, 0020.47, 0020.48, 0020.50, 0021.07, 0021.11, 0021.12, 0023.06, 0023.07, 0023.08, 0023.09, 0023.10, 0023.11, 0023.12, 0023.13, 0023.14, 0023.15, 0027.03, 0027.05, 0027.06, 0027.07, 0027.08, 0028.01, 0035.03, 0035.05, 0035.06, 0035.07, 0035.09,
 0035.10, 0036.03, 0036.07, 0036.09, 0036.11, 0036.12, 0037.00, 0038.01, 0038.03, 0038.04, 0039.00, 0041.01, 0041.03, 0041.04, 0042.01, 0042.02, 0043.01, 0043.02, 0044.01, 0044.03, 0044.04, 0045.05, 0045.07, 0045.09, 0045.10, 0045.11, 0045.12, 0046.01, 0046.03, 0046.04, 0047.00, 0048.00, 0049.01, 0049.02, 0051.01, 0051.02, 0052.00, 0053.00, 0054.00, 0055.01, 0055.02, 0056.01, 0056.02, 0057.01, 0058.00, 0061.01, 0062.01, 0062.03, 0062.04, 0063.01, 0063.03, 0063.04, 0064.01, 0064.02, 0065.01, 0065.02, 0066.01, 0066.03, 0066.04, 0067.00, 0070.01, 0070.02, 0071.04, 0071.05, 0071.06, 0071.07, 0071.08, 0071.10, 0071.11, 0071.12, 0074.07, 0074.08, 0074.09, 0074.10, 0074.12, 0076.03, 0076.04, 0076.05, 0076.06, 0079.03, 0079.04, 0079.05, 0080.01, 0080.03, 0080.04, 0081.00, 0082.01, 0082.02, 0084.02, 0084.04, 0084.05, 0124.00, 0125.00, 9801.00

Partial Tracts in San Bernardino County

0020.16--the following census blocks:

2015, 2018, 2019

0020.19--the following census blocks:

1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 2000, 2001, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006

0020.21--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006

0020.27--the following census blocks:

2014

0020.28--the following census blocks:

1017, 1018, 1019

0020.35--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 4000, 4001, 4002, 4003, 4004, 4005

0020.40--the following census blocks:

1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016

0020.41--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 2000, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012, 2013, 2014, 2015, 2016, 2017, 2018, 2019, 2020, 2021, 2022, 2023, 2024, 2025, 2026, 2027, 2028, 2029

0020.42--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1012,
 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020

0020.51--the following census blocks:

1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1014

0021.03--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 3000

0021.05--the following census blocks:

1012, 1013, 1014, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, 2007, 2008, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007, 3008, 3009, 3010, 3011, 3012, 3013, 3014, 3015, 3016, 3017, 3018, 3019, 3020, 3021, 3022

0022.04--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 3000, 3001, 4001, 4002

0022.07--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003

0024.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1005, 1007, 1008, 2001, 2002

0027.09--the following census blocks:

1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 1011, 1012, 1013, 1014, 1015, 1016, 1017, 1018, 1019, 1020, 1021, 1022, 1023, 1024, 1025, 1026, 1027, 1028, 1029, 1030, 1031, 1032, 1033, 1034, 1035, 1036, 1037, 1038, 1039, 1040, 1041, 1042, 1043, 1044, 1045, 1046, 1047, 1048, 1049, 1050, 1051, 1052, 1053, 1054, 1055, 1056, 1057

0029.01--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001,
 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 2000, 2001

0029.02--the following census blocks:

1000, 1001, 1002, 1003, 1004, 1005, 1006, 1007, 1008, 1009, 1010, 2000, 2001, 2002, 2003

0034.01--the following census blocks:

1001

0034.03--the following census blocks:

2000, 2001, 2002, 2003, 2004, 2005, 2008, 2009

0034.04--the following census blocks:

1000, 2000, 2003, 2004, 2005

0034.05--the following census blocks:

2002, 2003, 3000, 3001, 3002, 3003, 3004, 3005, 3006, 3007
